Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-138.03
Nonprofit corporations; license; required.

A nonprofit corporation shall not engage in the sale of alcoholic liquor without first having obtained a license required by the Nebraska Liquor Control Act.

Laws 1963, c. 310, § 11, p. 934;

Laws 1965, c. 318, § 8, p. 898;

Laws 1983, LB 213, § 17;

Laws 2004, LB 485, § 27.

For general penalties, see section 53-1,100 et seq.